Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6774XS (1) 91 as/js S.F. 2323 Section 1. Section 80A.4, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. Has never not been convicted of a felony or aggravated 3 misdemeanor within the ten years preceding the application . 4